District of Columbia statutes.
48-831.03

Establishment of AccessRx.

(a)

AccessRx is hereby established. AccessRx shall be administered by the Department, which shall utilize, among other things, manufacturer rebates, pharmacy discounts, and aggregate purchasing to reduce prescription drug prices. In addition, the Department shall investigate the purchase of prescription drugs from outside of the United States.

(b)

The Department shall administer AccessRx and other medical and pharmaceutical assistance programs in a manner that is advantageous to the programs and to the enrollees in those programs. In implementing this subchapter, the Department may coordinate the other programs and AccessRx and may take actions to enhance efficiency, reduce the cost of prescription drugs, and maximize the benefits to the programs and enrollees, including providing the benefits of AccessRx to enrollees in other programs.

History

May 18, 2004, D.C. Law 15-164, § 103, 51 DCR 3688

Section References

This section is referenced in § 48-831.02.